hu_HU.dic
újmoldovabányai/ADFUQK
összekutyulódó/ADFUQKXY
õrbottyáni/ADFUQK
ócsárolandó/ADFUQKX
éjszakázható/ADFUQKX
ásított/ADFQUX
árkodi/ADFUQK
álmélkodott/ADFQUX
államosító/ADFUQKXY
ágaskodó/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXY
zászlózhatatlan/ADFUKQX
zuhanó/ADFUQKXY
zsugoríttató/ADFUQKXY
zseníroztatható/ADFUQKX
zeuszi/ADFUQK
zajzoni/ADFUQK
vörösszárnyú/ADFUQK
vázoltatott/ADFQUX
vánszoroghatatlan/ADFUKQX
választatható/ADFUQKX
vulgáris/ADFUKS
vonalozhatatlan/ADFUKQX
vitorlázott/ADFQUX
visszautasíthatatlan/ADFUKQ
világoltatott/ADFQUX
vihorásztatható/ADFUQKX
vibráltatott/ADFQUX
vavrecskai/ADFUQK
varjasi/ADFUQK
vakogott/ADFQUX
vagdalóztatható/ADFUQKX
utánnyomatandó/ADFUQKX
uraskodó/ADFUQKXY
ugráltatott/ADFQUX
túloztatott/ADFQUX
tósnyárasdi/ADFUQK
távirányíttatott/ADFQUX
tárgyalható/ADFUQKX
tálalható/ADFUQKX
tusoltatott/ADFQUX
tuhrinai/ADFUQK
trágyázott/ADFQUX
transzformálódott/ADFQUX
torzsalkodott/ADFQUX
toporzékoltató/ADFUQKXY
tollasozandó/ADFUQKX
tivornyás/ADFUKS
tiszaújvárosi/ADFUQK
tiloltatható/ADFUQKX
tengerhajózási/ADFUQK
tataroztatott/ADFQUX
tarrósi/ADFUQK
tapogatható/ADFUQKX
tanított/ADFUQADFQUX
találandó/ADFUQKX
tahitótfalusi/ADFUQK
súlyosbíttatott/ADFQUX
sík/AUKkQYcDADFUKQ
sápítoztató/ADFUQKXY
szõllõskislaki/ADFUQK
szívózott/ADFQUX
székelyszentmihályi/ADFUQK
szárnyaztató/ADFUQKXY
számíttató/ADFUQKXY
szállongott/ADFQUX
szusszantó/ADFUQKXY
szuhogyi/ADFUQK
sztereofónikus/ADFUKS
szopató/ADFUQKXY
szolgálati/ADFUQK
szivattyúzandó/ADFUQKX
szincerizáltatható/ADFUQKX
szihalomi/ADFUQK
szerencsfalvi/ADFUQK
szemantikus/ADFUKS
szatócskodott/ADFQUX
szaporodó/ADFUQKXY
szalasztató/ADFUQKXY
szakadatlan/ADFUKQ
szabványosított/ADFQUX
suttyantó/ADFUQKXY
sugági/ADFUQK
stornírozott/ADFQUX
sraffírozott/ADFQUX
sorsoltatott/ADFQUX
somfalui/ADFUQK
slukkolandó/ADFUQKX
sinkófálhatatlan/ADFUKQX
sikoltoztatott/ADFQUX
sattyoghatatlan/ADFUKQX
sandi/ADFUQK
sajdíthatatlan/ADFUKQX
répáshutai/ADFUQK
ráncosító/ADFUQKXY
rácsoztatható/ADFUQKX
rugdaltatott/ADFQUX
rotyogatandó/ADFUQKX
rongyoló/ADFUQKXY
rohanhatatlan/ADFUKQX
ritkíttatott/ADFQUX
rikkantatandó/ADFUQKX
retiráltató/ADFUQKXY
rendszabályoztatható/ADFUQKX
rekettyefalusi/ADFUQK
rebrai/ADFUQK
raktároztató/ADFUQKXY
ragasztó/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXY
púzó/ADFUQKXY
pélmonostori/ADFUQK
párosíttató/ADFUQKXY
pályázó/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXY
puszizó/ADFUQKXY
puhultatott/ADFQUX
próbálgató/ADFUQKXY
proletarizáltató/ADFUQKXY
priorált/ADFUQADFQUX
potyáztatott/ADFQUX
porszívóztatható/ADFUQKX
pontosíthatatlan/ADFUKQX
polcolhatatlan/ADFUKQX
pocskolható/ADFUQKX
pityizáltatható/ADFUQKX
pirkadtatott/ADFQUX
petíciózott/ADFQUX
perfektuáltatott/ADFQUX
pattogató/ADFUQKXY
passziózó/ADFUQKXY
parittyáztatható/ADFUQKX
panádi/ADFUQK
palizó/ADFUQKXY
packáztató/ADFUQKXY
oszlányi/ADFUQK
oroszvolovai/ADFUQK
optáltatott/ADFQUX
oláhsolymosi/ADFUQK
ollósági/ADFUQK
okosítandó/ADFUQKX
obrucsnói/ADFUQK
nákófalvai/ADFUQK
nyírbogdányi/ADFUQK
nyulasi/ADFUQK
nyomoríttatható/ADFUQKX
nyiszáltatható/ADFUQKX
nyiffantató/ADFUQKXY
nyakalhatatlan/ADFUKQX
nivellálandó/ADFUQKX
naturalista/ADFUQK
nagytárnoki/ADFUQK
nagyobbítható/ADFUQKX
nagyhangúskodtató/ADFUQKXY
nadapi/ADFUQK
mészárolható/ADFUQKX
másoló/ADFUQKXY
mámorosítandó/ADFUQKX
murányhuttai/ADFUQK
mozdíttató/ADFUQKXY
mosdatható/ADFUQKX
montíroztató/ADFUQKXY
modrai/ADFUQK
minuciózus/ADFUKS
mezõtóháti/ADFUQK
melléírandó/ADFUQK
megrostált/ADFUQ
meggyógyult/ADFUQ
mediterrán/ADFUKQ
maszkolt/ADFQUX
marjító/ADFUQKXY
manipuláltatott/ADFQUX
majsai/ADFUQK
magyarosítandó/ADFUQKX
magasztosult/ADFQUX
lógatott/ADFQUX
léghajózandó/ADFUQKX
lágyíttatható/ADFUQKX
lukácsfalvi/ADFUQK
lopózkodtatott/ADFQUX
locsmándi/ADFUQK
liliomosi/ADFUQK
leszarható/ADFUQKX
lelombozódható/ADFUQKX
legidáztatható/ADFUQKX
lazíttató/ADFUQKXY
lapultatható/ADFUQKX
landoltatott/ADFQUX
lagymatag/ADFUKQ
középvárcai/ADFUQK
köntörfalaztatott/ADFQUX
kódolható/ADFUQKX
kétlábú/ADFUQK
károsítható/ADFUQKX
kácsi/ADFUQK
kuszáló/ADFUQKXY
kuptoriai/ADFUQK
kulcsolt/ADFQUX
krákogtatható/ADFUQKX
kozmásíttatható/ADFUQKX
kotoltattatott/ADFQUX
kortyoló/ADFUQKXY
korogó/ADFUQKXY
korbácsoltatott/ADFQUX
kooptálhatatlan/ADFUKQX
kontrolláltatott/ADFQUX
konfrontálandó/ADFUQKX
komédiáztatható/ADFUQKX
kommunizálható/ADFUQKX
kollokvált/ADFQUX
kocsmázandó/ADFUQKX
klisíroztató/ADFUQKXY
kispaládi/ADFUQK
királyfalvi/ADFUQK
kidomborodandó/ADFUQKX
kazalozott/ADFQUX
karistoló/ADFUQKXY
kapdostatott/ADFQUX
kalászoltató/ADFUQKXY
kacagtató/ADFUQKXY
jánki/ADFUQK
jabukai/ADFUQK
iszapos/AUKkSYcDADFUKS
involvált/ADFQUX
inflálódható/ADFUQKX
ilonokújfalusi/ADFUQK
identifikálható/ADFUQKX
háziasíttató/ADFUQKXY
hájaztatható/ADFUQKX
huligánkodtató/ADFUQKXY
horgaszthatatlan/ADFUKQX
hivatkoztatott/ADFQUX
hermetizálható/ADFUQKX
határfalvi/ADFUQK
harcoló/ADFUQKXY
hamukáltatható/ADFUQKX
hajtódott/ADFQUX
hadarandó/ADFUQKX
gálosházai/ADFUQK
gyomrozhatatlan/ADFUKQX
gurányi/ADFUQK
gondolkodtató/ADFUQK
generalizáló/ADFUQKXY
gajdolt/ADFQUX
fénymásoló/AUKQykYcDADFUQKXY
furnikári/ADFUQK
fosztogatható/ADFUQKX
fonó/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXY
fogyóztatott/ADFQUX
fitymálódó/ADFUQKXY
fermentálódott/ADFQUX
felsõmihályfalvi/ADFUQK
felfalugyógyi/ADFUQK
fanyalogandó/ADFUQKX
fabulázott/ADFQUX
erdõtkai/ADFUQK
elszociografizáltató/ADFUQKXY
elkacagjat/ADFQUX
elandalodott/ADFQUX
dúcoltatott/ADFQUX
dunsztoló/ADFUQKXY
drágalátoskodhatatlan/ADFUKQX
dohányzó/AUKQkYcDADFUQKXYADFUKQXY
diszkontálható/ADFUQKX
detronizáltatott/ADFQUX
dematerializálhatatlan/ADFUKQX
darázsfalvai/ADFUQK
curukkolt/ADFQUX
csíkásztató/ADFUQKXY
csurdíttató/ADFUQKXY
csomagoltatott/ADFQUX
csiklázárfalvi/ADFUQK
csavartatott/ADFQUX
csalinkázó/ADFUQKXY
ciklizálható/ADFUQKX
búslakodó/ADFUQKXY
békefalui/ADFUQK
bácsordasi/ADFUQK
bujkáltatható/ADFUQKX
botoztató/ADFUQKXY
borotválhatatlan/ADFUKQX
bolydulható/ADFUQKX
bodoríttató/ADFUQKXY
birizgált/ADFQUX
berzai/ADFUQK
belepistuló/ADFUQKXY
bazíroztató/ADFUQKXY
balázsfalvi/ADFUQK
babrálgató/ADFUQKXY
asszekuráltató/ADFUQKXY
appercipiált/ADFQUX
amputáltatható/ADFUQKX
alsóstrázsai/ADFUQK
allelujázhatatlan/ADFUKQX
aktualizálandó/ADFUQKX
agrárius/ADFUKS
acsuvai/ADFUQK
